Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 2

Soil Scientist Licensure Act of 2009

62-18-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Soil Scientist Licensure Act of 2009.”

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 2.

62-18-202. Legislative findings — Purpose.

The general assembly finds that the competent and proper application of soil science principles by soil scientists is vital to the lives, property, economy, security, and environment of the people of this state. In order to safeguard life, health, and property and to promote the public welfare, the practice of soil science in this state is hereby declared to be subject to regulation in the public interest. Furthermore, the practice of soil science is hereby declared a learned profession to be practiced and regulated as such, and its practitioners in this state shall be held accountable to the state and members of the public by high professional standards in keeping with the ethics and practices of other learned professions in this state. The purpose of this part is to introduce additional qualifying criteria in a professional field at present only partially regulated, thereby benefiting the safety, health, and property of the people of Tennessee and promoting the public welfare. The fields of soil science expected to benefit are those related to the environment, soil classification and mapping, the inventory of the soil as a resource, basic soil science research, and other soil science matters of concern to the people of this state. This legislation does not attempt to infringe upon the current licensed professions of engineers, geologists, surveyors, or the persons who work directly for them as either their employees or as subcontractors. This legislation differentiates the principles of soil science from those respected and established fields.

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 3.

62-18-203. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Classification” means the use and application of the current United States department of agriculture (USDA) soil taxonomy standard as revised, classifying soils to the order, suborder, great group, subgroup, family, series, or phase of series level;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce and insurance, or the commissioner's designee;

“Department” means the department of commerce and insurance;

“Licensed professional soil scientist” means a person who is licensed as a soil scientist under this part;

“Practice of soil science” means providing soil science services except as specifically exempted by this part. Soil science services include the investigation, inspection, collection, or evaluation of soil as a means to classify soil pursuant to the use and application of the USDA soil taxonomy standard, as revised, or the interpretation, inventory, planning, or mapping resulting from classifying soils;

“Responsible charge of work” means accountable, independent control and direction by the use of initiative, skill, and independent judgment, of soil science work or supervision of soil science work;

“Soil science” means the science concerning the earth's mantle and its use by all humans including:

The classification, investigation, mapping and inventorying of soil; and

The study of the interaction of soil forming factors;

Climate;

Organisms;

Relief;

Parent material; and

Time;

“Soil scientist” means a person qualified by education and practical experience to engage in the practice of soil science; and

“Soil scientist in training” means a person who has met or is pursuing the educational requirements of § 62-18-208, but is not qualified to be licensed as a professional soil scientist.

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 4.

62-18-204. Restrictions on the practice of soil science.

No person shall:

Classify soils pursuant to the use and application of the USDA soil taxonomy standard, as revised, prepare any soil maps, reports, or documents resulting from the classification of soils, other than a licensed professional soil scientist or a subordinate under such soil scientist's direction;

Practice soil science in this state unless such person is licensed under this part. A certificate of licensure is not transferable;

Offer to practice soil science in this state unless such person is licensed under this part. To offer to practice soil science in this state includes the making of a verbal claim, displaying a sign or other advertisement, using letterhead, printing cards, or using in connection with a person's name any title or description stating or implying that the person is a licensed professional soil scientist;

On or after July 1, 2011, seal or stamp any plans, plats, reports or other documents with the seal or stamp of a licensed professional soil scientist, or use in any manner the title “licensed professional soil scientist” or the title of any licensed certified specialty soil scientist unless licensed or licensed and certified under this part;

Affix such person's signature, seal, or stamp to any maps, reports, or other documents after such person's licensure has expired or has been suspended or revoked, unless such person's licensure has been renewed or reissued;

Give any false or forged evidence of any kind to the commissioner when seeking to obtain the person's certificate of licensure;

Falsely impersonate any other licensee of like or different name; or

Attempt to use an expired or revoked certificate of licensure or continue to practice soil science at any time during a period during which the commissioner has suspended or revoked the person's certificate of licensure.

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 5.

62-18-205. Contracting for soil science services.

This state and any county, municipality, agency, board, district, commission, authority, or other political subdivision of the state shall only contract for soil science services with persons licensed under this part or with a firm employing a licensed professional soil scientist who shall be in responsible charge of providing such services, except as otherwise provided by this part.

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 6.

62-18-206. Applicability of part — Exemptions.

Any person, except a person exempted by this part, who practices or offers to practice soil science in this state, including a person employed by the state or its political subdivisions, is subject to this part. The following persons are exempt:

Any person engaged solely in teaching the science of soil science or engaged solely in nonpublic soils research in this state. However, a teacher or researcher shall be certified as licensed professional soil scientist if the teacher or researcher wishes to engage in the practice of soil science or services for which licensure as a soil scientist is required by this part;

An employee or subordinate of a licensed professional soil scientist insofar as the employee or subordinate acts solely in such capacity. This exemption shall not permit any such employee or subordinate to practice soil science independently or use the term “licensed professional soil scientist;” and

Any person who is employed either by the state or federal government, or by a person, firm, or corporation not engaged in the practice of soil science, if such person provides soil science services only as part of his job duties for the employer and does not receive any payments for soil science services from the general public.

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 7.

62-18-207. Engaging in practice of soil science — Construction of part.

A sole proprietorship, partnership, or corporation that provides soil science services as defined in this part as its primary activity may engage in the practice of soil science; provided, that at least one (1) principal or officer is in responsible charge of such activity and is a licensed professional soil scientist. A sole proprietorship, partnership, or corporation whose primary activity is other than the practice of soil science may offer soil science services; provided, that a licensed professional soil scientist is in responsible charge of such activity. The exemptions of § 62-18-206 shall apply to sole proprietorships, partnerships, and corporations.

This part shall not be construed to prevent or to affect the practice of any profession or trade related to soil science for which a license or registration is required under any other law of this state when such work is permitted under the applicable licensing or registration law.

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 8.

62-18-208. Eligibility for certificate of licensure.

To be eligible for a certificate of licensure, an applicant shall meet each of the following minimum qualifications:

Be a graduate of an accredited college or university with a bachelor of science degree or higher in soils, agronomy or a closely related field. The applicant shall have successfully completed a minimum of fifteen (15) semester hours of course work in soil science;

Have at least three (3) years of soil science professional experience. Any combination of the following kinds of education and experience qualify toward accumulating the required three (3) years:

Masters of science degree in soils, agronomy or a closely related field and two (2) years of professional experience;

Doctor of philosophy degree in soils, agronomy or a closely related field and one (1) year of professional experience; or

Each year of teaching or soil science research by persons teaching upper-level soil science courses at the college or university levels; provided, that such teaching or research can be demonstrated to be of a sufficiently responsible nature to be equivalent to a year of professional experience; and

Have successfully passed such examination or examinations developed or determined by the commissioner to assess adequately the knowledge and skills that are common to the competent practice of soil science as a profession. The commissioner shall waive the examination requirement for licensure as a soil scientist for an applicant who makes written application to the commissioner not later than July 1, 2011, and who otherwise meets the requirements of this subsection (a).

Any person who meets subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) and who is:

Approved by the department of environment and conservation prior to July 1, 2011;

An employee of the federal government 470 series;

A soil scientist employed by this state; or

A member of the Soil Scientist Association of Tennessee certified list prior to July 1, 2011;

shall be deemed to have met the requirements of subdivisions (a)(1)-(3). Such person shall be issued a certificate of licensure when renewal is due under the established renewal cycle upon applying for and meeting all requirements for renewal. The commissioner shall assign the registration number of the registration certificate as the certificate of licensure number. Any person holding an active certificate as a registered soil scientist or licensed professional soil scientist prior to July 1, 2011, who does not renew such certificate when renewal is due shall be required to apply for licensure under this part and meet all requirements of subsection (a) except that a reasonable period of time shall be accorded by the commissioner for late renewals.

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 9.

62-18-209. Certificate of licensure.

The commissioner shall issue a certificate of licensure, upon payment of a fee prescribed by the commissioner, to any applicant who complies with the requirements of this part. Certificates of licensure shall state the full name of the licensee, bear a certificate of licensure number and be signed by the commissioner under the seal of the commissioner. The commissioner shall consider and may implement all reasonable operating cost reductions suggested by the advisory committee in calculating any recurring or nonrecurring fees or additional charges to licensed professional soil scientists.

A certificate of licensure shall be valid for a period of two (2) years. A fee prescribed by the commissioner shall be imposed for each late certificate of licensure renewal.

A new certificate of licensure may be issued to replace any certificate of licensure lost, destroyed, or mutilated, subject to the rules of the commissioner and payment of a fee prescribed by the commissioner.

Upon a written request accompanied by a fee prescribed by the commissioner for change in status, a licensee shall be placed on retired or inactive status. No retired or inactive licensee shall engage in practicing soil science or services for which licensure as a soil scientist is required by this part. The commissioner shall prescribe rules outlining the procedure for placing a licensee in retired or inactive status and subsequent reinstatement to active status.

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 10.

62-18-210. [Repealed.]

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 11; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 641, § 4, effective April 1, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-18-210 concerned the soil scientist advisory commission.

Acts 2020, ch. 641, § 2 provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112, the soil scientist advisory committee, created by § 62-18-210, shall terminate and shall cease to exist on April 1, 2020.

62-18-211. Duties of commissioner.

In addition to other powers and duties specified in this chapter, the commissioner shall:

Promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out this part in compliance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5;

Design and adopt an official seal for licensed professional soil scientists to be applied to all drawings, reports, maps, documents, or other papers involving practicing soil science as defined in this part, that have been prepared or approved by a licensed soil scientist or a subordinate employee under such soil scientist's direction for the use of or for delivery to any person or for public record within this state. Such drawings, reports, maps, documents, or other papers shall be signed by the licensee and impressed with the licensee's seal. Such acts shall indicate a licensee's responsibility for such drawings, reports, or other papers or documents;

Set the amount of all fees required by this part;

Promulgate rules requiring continuing education;

Identify and approve continuing education programs for persons regulated by the commissioner under this part;

Receive, administer, and account for all moneys derived under this part and transfer such funds to the state treasurer who shall keep such moneys in a fund, herein established, to be known as the “geologist and soil scientist regulatory fund”. The fund shall be used to defray expenses incurred in the administration of the Geologist Licensure Act of 2007, compiled in chapter 36, part 1 of this title, and this chapter;

Prepare, administer, and grade a nationally recognized soil scientist examination for the purposes of licensure as required by this part; and

Have such other powers and duties as are necessary to effectuate this part.

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 12; 2014, ch. 921, § 1; 2020, ch. 641, § 3.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “, under advisement from SSAC,” following “commissioner” in the introductory language of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 641, § 6. April 1, 2020.

62-18-212. Recognition of foreign registration.

Any applicant may, in the absence of disqualifying evidence, be deemed by the commissioner to be fully qualified to practice soil science if such applicant holds a like, unexpired certificate of registration issued to the applicant after examination by proper authority in the District of Columbia or in any state or territory in the United States in which the examination and requirements for the registration of soil scientists are of a standard satisfactory to the commissioner.

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 13.

62-18-213. Confidential information.

Except as otherwise provided by this part, the following shall be treated as confidential and may not be disclosed except by order of a court of competent jurisdiction or by permission of the applicant:

Applications and other personal information submitted by applicants, except to the applicant, the commissioner, department, or its staff; and

Information submitted by a reference concerning an applicant, except to the commissioner, department, or its staff.

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 14; 2020, ch. 641, § 5.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “department, or its staff” for “department, its staff, or the SSAC” in (1) and (2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 641, § 6. April 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

62-18-214. Roster of licensed soil scientists.

A roster showing the names and places of business of all licensed soil scientists shall be prepared by the commissioner each year. Copies of this roster shall be placed on file with the secretary of state and furnished to any licensee upon request, free of charge, or to the public upon request and payment of a fee, not to exceed actual cost, to be established by the commissioner.

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 15.

62-18-215. Code of ethics.

The commissioner shall promulgate a code of professional ethics that shall be made known in writing to every licensee and applicant for licensure under this part. The department may revise and amend this code of professional ethics from time to time and shall forthwith notify each licensee in writing of such revision or amendments.

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 16.

62-18-216. Complaints against licensees.

Any person may file a complaint with the commissioner against a licensee alleging fraud, deceit, gross neglect, incompetence, or misconduct. Complaints shall be made in writing.

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 17.

62-18-217. Grounds for suspension, revocation or refusal to renew licensure — Hearing — Administrative or judicial review — Injunction — Reissuance.

The commissioner shall have the power to suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the certificate of licensure of any licensee who:

Is found to have been convicted of:

Any fraud or deceit in obtaining a certificate of licensure;

A felony for the commission of an offense that bears directly on the licensee's fitness to practice competently, as determined by the commissioner. However, an action taken under this subdivision (a)(1)(B) shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 76, part 1 of this title; or

Any unlawful act as set forth in this chapter; or

Who is found guilty of fraud, deceit, gross neglect, incompetence, or misconduct in the practice of soil science as a licensed professional soil scientist.

Any such action by the commissioner to suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a certificate of licensure shall be taken after a hearing held in accordance with the procedures set forth in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Any administrative or judicial review of such action shall likewise be in accordance with the procedures set forth in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

The commissioner may seek relief at law or equity to restrain or enjoin any act or practice in violation of this part, or of any rule promulgated to effectuate the purposes of this part. Jurisdiction is conferred upon the chancery and circuit courts of this state to hear and determine such a suit. No bond shall be required for the prosecution of the suit or for the issuance of an injunction.

The commissioner may reissue a certificate of licensure to any person whose certificate of licensure has been revoked upon written application to the commissioner by the applicant, showing good cause to justify such reissuance.

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 18; 2016, ch. 719, § 5; 2018, ch. 745, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 719, § 11 provided that this act, which amended (a)(1)(B), shall take effect on April 6, 2016, and shall apply to actions instituted by state entities on or after April 6, 2016.

62-18-218. Legal counsel.

Legal counsel shall be provided by the division of regulatory boards.

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 19.

62-18-219. Violations — Disciplinary actions — Penalties.

A violation of this part is a Class B misdemeanor.

In addition to, or in lieu of, any other lawful disciplinary action under this part, the commissioner may assess a civil penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation. All penalties owed under this part shall be paid to the commissioner for deposit into the treasury of the state of Tennessee and shall accrue to the state and may be recovered in a civil action in the name of the state in any court of record in the county where the violation is alleged to have occurred.

Any civil penalty shall be assessed in the following manner:

A notice of such assessment shall be sent to the person receiving it by certified mail, return receipt requested;

Any person against whom an assessment has been issued may petition the commissioner for a review of the assessment;

The petition for review shall be in writing, and shall be filed no later than thirty (30) days after the notice of assessment is received;

If a petition for review of the assessment is not filed within thirty (30) days after the date the notice is received, then the violator shall be deemed to have consented to the assessment and it shall become final; and

If a petition for review of the assessment is filed as provided by this section, then the proceedings on such appeal shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions set forth in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, with respect to the conduct of contested cases.

Acts 2010, ch. 1032, § 20.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-13-307. Expiration and renewal of licenses — Penalty.

62-13-316. Register of applicants required.

62-18-122. Business associations — Personal liability.